Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.564

[Art. 67] Review counsel.

(1) Upon the final review of a sentence of a general court-martial, the accused has the right to be represented by counsel before the reviewing authority, before the staff judge advocate, and before the state judge advocate.

(2) Upon the request of an accused entitled to be so represented, the state judge advocate shall appoint a lawyer who is a member of the organized militia and who has the qualifications prescribed in RCW 38.38.260, if available, to represent the accused before the reviewing authority, before the staff judge advocate, and before the state judge advocate, in the review of cases specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) If provided by the accused, an accused entitled to be so represented may be represented by civilian counsel before the reviewing authority, before the staff judge advocate, and before the state judge advocate.

[ 1991 c 43 s 8; 1989 c 48 s 57; 1963 c 220 s 69.]